District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.28

Rate and form filing requirements for accident and health policies.

The Commissioner may require that the provisions and conditions contained in any policy of insurance against loss or damage from sickness or bodily injury or death of the insured by accident issued by, and the rate-making and filing obligations of, any company authorized by this chapter to transact business in the District be made to conform to the requirements prescribed under § 31-4712.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1076, ch. 792, ch. II, § 28
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 501, 58 DCR 896
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 87, 59 DCR 6190
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 18-360 which did not affect this section as codified.
D.C. Law 18-360, in the section heading, substituted “Rate and form filing requirements for” for “Required provisions in”; and substituted “issued by, and the rate-making and filing obligations of,” for “issued by”.
1973 Ed., § 35-1332.
1981 Ed., § 35-1532.